District of Columbia statutes.
31-5602.11

Continuing education.

The Commissioner may, by rule or order, establish continuing education requirements for investment adviser representatives.

History

Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 211
as added June 25, 2002, D.C. Law 14-150, § 2(d), 49 DCR 4238